Rhode Island, session 2025, SB303.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-29-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-29 entitled "Fees" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
9-29-5. Jurors’ fees.
(a) All grand and petit jurors shall be paid for each day’s attendance on the superior court
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) fifty dollars ($50.00) per day commencing July 1, 2022 2025, and
thereafter. The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to
carry out the purposes of this section.
(b) Any grand or petit juror may, upon signing a form approved by the presiding justice of
the superior court, donate their jury fee to the state. Any such donation shall be deposited into the
general fund and shall be allocated to the Rhode Island Veterans Home Community Living Center.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001431
========